Arkansas, session 2025, HB1765.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 5-26-305(b), concerning the classification
of domestic battering in the third degree, is amended to read as follows:
(b)(1) Domestic battering in the third degree is a Class A
misdemeanor.
(2) However, domestic battering in the third degree is a Class D
felony if:
(A) Committed against a woman the person knew or
reasonably should have known was pregnant; or
(B) The person committed one (1) or more of the following
offenses acts that would constitute any of the following offenses within five
(5) years of the offense of domestic battering in the third degree:
(i) Domestic battering in the first degree, § 5-26-
303;
*CEB063*
03/12/2025 11:27:49 AM CEB063

HB1765
(ii) Domestic battering in the second degree, § 5-26-
304;
(iii) Domestic battering in the third degree;
(iv) Aggravated assault on a family or household
member, § 5-26-306; or
(v) A violation of an equivalent penal law of this
state or of another state or foreign jurisdiction.
(C) If the person has not been convicted of a prior act
listed under subdivision (b)(2)(B) of this section, the state may establish a
classification enhancement by proving the commission of a prior act listed in
subdivision (b)(2)(B) of this section beyond a reasonable doubt during its
case in chief.
























03/12/2025 11:27:49 AM CEB063